test/src/gt-desc-yamls/transitiveci_gt-desc.ana.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Verb - transitive verb consonant initial - ok : # Test for intransitive verb inflection consonant initial

    # Obj. = 1st person singular consonant initial
    sik'+V+TV+Prs+SetB.Sg1+SetA.Sg2: nikinaasik' # me buscas
    sik'+V+TV+Prs+SetB.Sg1+SetA.Sg3: nikinixsik' # me busca él TODO what is going on here?
    sik'+V+TV+Prs+SetB.Sg1+SetA.Pl2: nikineesik' # me buscan ustedes
    sik'+V+TV+Prs+SetB.Sg1+SetA.Pl3: nikine'xsik' # me buscan ellos
    # Obj. = 1st person plural consonant initial
    sik'+V+TV+Prs+SetB.Pl1+SetA.Sg2: nokohaasik' # nos buscas
    sik'+V+TV+Prs+SetB.Pl1+SetA.Sg3: nokoxsik' # nos busca él
    sik'+V+TV+Prs+SetB.Pl1+SetA.Pl2: nokoheesik' # nos buscan ustedes
    sik'+V+TV+Prs+SetB.Pl1+SetA.Pl3: nokohe'xsik' # nos buscan ellos
    # Obj. = 2nd person singular consonant initial
    sik'+V+TV+Prs+SetB.Sg2+SetA.Sg1: nakatinsik' # te busco
    sik'+V+TV+Prs+SetB.Sg2+SetA.Sg3: nakatxsik' # te busca él
    sik'+V+TV+Prs+SetB.Sg2+SetA.Pl1: nakatqasik' # te buscamos
    sik'+V+TV+Prs+SetB.Sg2+SetA.Pl3: nakate'xsik' # te buscan ellos
    # Obj = 2nd person plural consonant initial
    sik'+V+TV+Prs+SetB.Pl2+SetA.Sg1: nekexinsik' # les busco a ustedes
    # TODO take a look at how this is spelled
    sik'+V+TV+Prs+SetB.Pl2+SetA.Sg3: nekexxsik' # él les busca a ustedes
    sik'+V+TV+Prs+SetB.Pl2+SetA.Pl1: nekexqasik' # les buscamos a ustedes
    sik'+V+TV+Prs+SetB.Pl2+SetA.Pl3: nekexxsik'eb' # ellos les buscan a ustedes
    # Obj = 3rd person singular consonant initial
    sik'+V+TV+Prs+SetB.Sg3+SetA.Sg1: ninsik' # lo busco
    sik'+V+TV+Prs+SetB.Sg3+SetA.Sg2: nakasik' # lo buscas
    sik'+V+TV+Prs+SetB.Sg3+SetA.Sg3: naxsik' # lo busca él
    sik'+V+TV+Prs+SetB.Sg3+SetA.Pl1: naqasik' # lo buscamos
    sik'+V+TV+Prs+SetB.Sg3+SetA.Pl2: nekesik' # lo buscan ustedes
    sik'+V+TV+Prs+SetB.Sg3+SetA.Pl3: neke'xsik' # lo buscan ellos
    # Obj. = 3rd person plural consonant initial
    # TODO look at what's going on here 
    sik'+V+TV+Prs+SetB.Pl3+SetA.Sg1: nekeb'insik' # los busco a ellos 
    sik'+V+TV+Prs+SetB.Pl3+SetA.Sg1: ninsik'eb' # los busco a ellos 
    sik'+V+TV+Prs+SetB.Pl3+SetA.Sg2: nakasik'eb' # los buscas 
    sik'+V+TV+Prs+SetB.Pl3+SetA.Sg3: naxsik'eb' # los busca él 
    sik'+V+TV+Prs+SetB.Pl3+SetA.Pl1: neke'qasik' # los buscamos 
    sik'+V+TV+Prs+SetB.Pl3+SetA.Pl1: naqasik'eb' # los buscamos
    sik'+V+TV+Prs+SetB.Pl3+SetA.Pl2: nekesik'eb' # ustedes los buscan 
    sik'+V+TV+Prs+SetB.Pl3+SetA.Pl2: neke'xsik'eb' # ellos los buscan a los otros
    
